Utah statutes.
26-6-7.   Designation of communicable diseases by department -- Establishment of rules for detection, reporting, investigation, prevention, and control.

The department may designate those diseases which are communicable, of concern to the public health, and reportable; and establish rules for the detection, reporting, investigation, prevention, and control of communicable diseases, epidemic infections, and other health hazards that affect the public health.

